Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WONDERTREK CHILDREN'S MUSEUM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to WonderTrek Children's Museum, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to design, construct, equip, and furnish capital improvements to phase I of a nine-acre children's museum campus in the city of Baxter. This appropriation includes money for site improvements, infrastructure, landscaping, a 2,400 square foot year-round indoor-outdoor classroom, four acres of nature play exhibits and environments, and outdoor recreation activities and education. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end